Hawaii statutes.
[§286-12] All-terrain vehicle;
utility-terrain vehicle; permitted use. (a) All-terrain vehicles and
utility-terrain vehicles may be operated on a street, as defined in section
291C-1; provided that the all-terrain vehicle or utility-terrain vehicle is:

(1) Used as farm equipment, or used by a city,
county, or state worker while acting within the scope of that person's official
duties;

(2) Operated by a person who holds a current category
(3) driver's license under section 286-102 or a commercial driver's license
under part XIII;

(3) Driven on streets that are no more than two
lanes, with posted speed limits of no more than thirty-five miles per hour;

(4) Used to travel between properties zoned for
agriculture, or used by a city, county, or state worker while acting within the
scope of that person's official duties to travel between properties under the
jurisdiction of the city, county, or State;

(5) Used in counties with populations of less than
five hundred thousand residents; and

(6) Driven on streets during daylight hours; provided
further that while in operation, any operator and passenger of an all-terrain
vehicle or utility-terrain vehicle shall wear a safety helmet with a securely
fastened chin strap that meets the specifications and requirements established
by rules adopted by the director.

(b) For purposes of this section:

"All-terrain
vehicle" means a motor vehicle that:

(1) Is designed for off-highway operation by a single
operator carrying no more than one passenger, if so designed as provided in
paragraph (5) of this definition;

(2) Is fifty inches or less in width;

(3) Has an unladen weight of nine hundred pounds or
less;

(4) Is suspended on three or more tires;

(5) Has a single seat designed to be straddled by the
operator, or a single seat designed to be straddled by the operator and a seat
for not more than one passenger sitting behind the operator; and

(6) Has handlebars for steering control.

"Farm equipment" refers to any kind
of machinery used on a farm to help with farming, including but not limited to
a tractor, cultivator, plow, all-terrain vehicle, or utility-terrain vehicle.

"Utility-terrain vehicle" means a
motor vehicle that:

(1) Is designed to be operated off highway;

(2) Is sixty inches or less in width;

(3) Has an unladen weight of one thousand three
hundred pounds or less;

(4) Is suspended on four to six tires;

(5) Has a steering wheel for steering control;

(6) Is equipped with roll-over protection;

(7) Accommodates one driver and one passenger sitting
side-by-side; and

(8) Is equipped with seat belts for driver and
passenger protection.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall
be fined $250 for each violation.

(d) All-terrain vehicles and utility-terrain
vehicles used as farm equipment shall be regulated as farm equipment and not as
motor vehicles.

(e) All-terrain vehicles and utility-terrain
vehicles used by a city, county, or state worker while acting within the scope
of that person's official duties shall not be regulated as motor vehicles. [L
2014, c 71, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next